Nevada, session 83, AB8.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 353.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.250 1. The State Treasurer shall designate the financial
institutions into which money received by a state officer, department
or commission must be deposited.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 4 and 5,
every state officer, department or commission which receives or
which may receive any money of the State of Nevada or for its use
and benefit shall deposit on or before Thursday of each week, in a
financial institution designated by the State Treasurer to the credit of
the State Treasurer’s Account, all money received by that officer,
department or commission during the previous week.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, if on
any day the money accumulated for deposit is $10,000 or more, a
deposit must be made not later than the next working day.
4. If the Department of Wildlife or the Division of State Parks
of the State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources
accumulates for deposit $10,000 or more on any day, the money
must be deposited within 10 working days.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the
Division of Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Health and Human Services accumulates for deposit $10,000 or
more in child support payments on any day, the money must be
deposited within 2 working days after its accumulation. Any such
money for which the Division is unable to identify the obligee
within 2 working days after its accumulation must, within 5 working
days after its accumulation, be:
(a) Deposited, if the Division is able to identify the obligee.
(b) Returned to the payor, if the Division is unable to identify
the obligee.
6. Every officer, department or commission which is required
to deposit money with the State Treasurer shall comply with that
requirement by depositing the money in a financial institution
designated by the State Treasurer to the credit of the State
Treasurer’s Account.
7. Every officer, head of any department or commissioner who
fails to comply with the provisions of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor in office.
8. As used in this section, “financial institution” means a bank,
savings and loan association, savings bank, thrift company or credit
union regulated pursuant to title 55 of NRS.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)